Utah statutes.
77-41-108.   Classification of information.

Notwithstanding Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, information under Subsection 77-41-103(4) that is collected and released under Subsection 77-41-110(4) is public information, unless otherwise restricted under Subsection 77-41-103(1).



Enacted by Chapter 145, 2012 General Session

